Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.52.092

School bus trespass.

(1) A person is guilty of school bus trespass if he or she knowingly and maliciously:

(a) Enters or remains unlawfully in a school bus;

(b) Does any other act that creates a substantial risk of harm to passengers or the driver; and

(c) Causes a substantial interruption or impairment to services rendered by the school bus.

(2) As used in this section, "school bus" means any vehicle owned, leased, or operated by a public school district, a religious or private school, a private entity contracted with a school district, or educational institution for the purpose of transporting students to and from school or school-related activities.

(3) School bus trespass is a gross misdemeanor.

(4) Subsection (1) of this section shall not apply to any of the following:

(a) Students enrolled in the school which is being serviced by the school bus;

(b) Law enforcement officers or other authorized personnel engaged in the performance of their official duties;

(c) Individuals with written consent from the school district or educational institution allowing them to enter or remain on the school bus; and

(d) Emergency situations where entering the bus is necessary to protect the safety or well-being of students or others.

(5) Local law enforcement agencies shall have the authority to enforce the provisions of chapter 302, Laws of 2024. School districts and educational institutions shall collaborate with local law enforcement to establish protocols and procedures to ensure effective enforcement of chapter 302, Laws of 2024.

(6) School districts and educational institutions shall implement educational programs and awareness campaigns to educate students, parents, and the community about the importance of maintaining safety and security on school buses. These educational programs shall emphasize the potential consequences of school bus trespassing in accordance with chapter 302, Laws of 2024.

(7) Subject to the availability of funds appropriated for this specific purpose, school districts and educational institutions shall affix placards warning of the consequences of violating subsection (1) of this section on the outside of all public school buses in a manner easily visible for all to see.

[ 2024 c 302 s 2.]

NOTES:

Short title—2024 c 302: "This act may be known and cited as the Richard Lenhart act." [ 2024 c 302 s 1.]